apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="fest/e__vblex_adj" c="gjere fast el. ¹= feire, ture">
  <e c="v:"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/></e>
  <!-- feste: feire -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e¹<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>e¹</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ore</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l>   <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>  <r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erande</l><r>ere<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l><r>ere</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erast</l> <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ore</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ori</l>   <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erer</l>  <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/åte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>åten</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åten</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åte</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åti</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtne</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtne</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtande</l><r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>åt</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åt</l><r>åte</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtast</l> <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åte</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åti</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æt</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ét</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gl/upe__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>   <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>  <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>   <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>   <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>opne</l>  <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>opne</l>  <r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upande</l><r>upe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>up</l>    <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>up</l><r>upe</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upast</l> <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>   <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>opi</l>   <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yp</l>    <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aup</l>   <r>upe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="attvere">         <i>attv</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnvere">         <i>unnv</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="låte">        <i>l</i><par n="l/åte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="målbere">         <i>målb</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="feste">           <i>fest</i><par n="fest/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hugbere"><i>hugb</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forbere"><i>forb</i><par n="hugb/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grupe"><i>gr</i><par n="gl/upe__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="glupe"><i>gl</i><par n="gl/upe__vblex_adj"/></e>
